Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.220

Procedure on appeal—Bond.

At the time of filing the notice of appeal with the clerk of the superior court, the appellant shall execute and file with him or her a sufficient bond in the penal sum of two hundred dollars, with at least two sureties to be approved by the judge of the court, conditioned to prosecute the appeal without delay and, if unsuccessful, to pay all reasonable costs and expenses which the city or town incurs by reason of the appeal. Upon application therefor, the court may order the appellant to execute and file such additional bonds as the necessity of the case may require.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2078; 1971 ex.s. c 116 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 258 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.44.220. Prior: 1957 c 143 s 4; prior: 1911 c 98 s 22, part; RRS s 9374, part.]